Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Animal Massage Therapy

63-12-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Animal massage therapy” means the manipulation of the soft tissues of the animal body with the intention of positively affecting the health and well-being of the animal. “Animal massage therapy” does not include the diagnosis, treatment, correction, alleviation, or prevention of any animal disease, illness, pain, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical or mental condition, or otherwise constitute the practice of veterinary medicine;

“Certified animal massage therapist” means a person who qualifies for, and voluntarily obtains, certification under this part; and

“Registered animal massage therapist” means a person who qualifies for, and voluntarily obtains, certification under this part.

Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 7. July 1, 2018 at 12:01 a.m.

63-12-202. Use of term “certified animal massage therapist” or “registered animal massage therapist” — Prohibitions.

No person shall use the title “certified animal massage therapist” or “registered animal massage therapist” unless the person meets the requirements of this part.

This part shall not prohibit any person from rendering or offering to render animal massage therapy services; provided, that a person who is not certified or registered under this part shall not use, or knowingly allow themselves to be identified by, the title “certified animal massage therapist” or “registered animal massage therapist”.

Persons who hold themselves out as certified animal massage therapists or registered animal massage therapists without complying with § 63-12-203 are in violation of the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1.

Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 7. July 1, 2018 at 12:01 a.m.

63-12-203. Use of term “certified animal massage therapist” or “registered animal massage therapist” — Requirements.

In order to use the term “certified animal massage therapist” or “registered animal massage therapist”, a person must:

Complete at least fifty (50) hours of training in anatomy and physiology, kinesiology, and pathologies in order to gain aptitude in preventing the delay of care to animals;

Complete at least fifty (50) hours of supervised in-class hands-on work, which would include assessment and execution of bodywork skills being studied, benefits of massage, benefits of acupressure, and practice guidelines; and

Take and pass an examination by the National Board of Certification for Animal Acupressure and Massage or a comparable examination that tests the aptitude in the course of training described in subdivisions (1) and (2).

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 5; 2019, ch. 69, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted former (4), which read: “Post a surety bond under § 63-12-204.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 7. July 1, 2018 at 12:01 a.m.

Acts 2019, ch. 69, § 2. July 1, 2019.

63-12-204. Liability insurance requirement.

A person practicing animal massage therapy shall obtain liability insurance in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the benefit of any person who is damaged because of the negligence of the person in the performance of animal massage therapy services.

Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 6.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 7. July 1, 2018 at 12:01 a.m.

63-12-137. Veterinary practice to be owned by veterinarian — Exemptions.